South Dakota, session 2026, HB1253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-6-101 be AMENDED:
10-6-101. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Assessment year," the year in which real property is assessed, which immediately
precedes the year in which property taxes are due and payable;
(2) "Department," the Department of Revenue;
(2)(3) "Director," a county's director of equalization;
(4) "Prior assessment year," the assessment year immediately preceding the current
assessment year;
(3)(5) "Tract," "lot," "piece," or "parcel," any contiguous quantity of land that is possessed
by, owned by, or recorded in the name of the same person.
Section 2. That § 10-6-119 be AMENDED:
10-6-119. The director shall individually assess each tract of real property at its
fair market value, subject to the limitations provided in section 3 of this Act.
In determining the fair market value of property, the director may not adopt a
lower or different standard of value because it is to serve as a basis of taxation. The
director may not adopt as a criterion of value the price for which a tract of real property
would sell at a forced sale, or in the aggregate with all other tracts of real property in the
county. The director shall determine the fair market value by appropriate consideration of
the cost approach, the market approach, and the income approach to appraisal. The
director shall consider and document all elements of such approaches that are applicable
prior to a determination of fair market value.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.428.40 2 1253
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-6:
Except as otherwise provided in sections 4 to 6, inclusive, of this Act, for the 2027
assessment year and each assessment year thereafter, the director shall adjust the
assessed value of each property classified as an owner-occupied single-family dwelling or
nonagricultural property, pursuant to § 10-6-110, to equal the lesser of:
(1) The fair market value of the property, determined pursuant to § 10-6-119; or
(2) The assessed value of the property in the prior assessment year, increased by five
percent.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-6:
Notwithstanding section 3 of this Act, every fifth assessment year, the director
shall assess each owner-occupied single-family dwelling and nonagricultural property,
classified pursuant to § 10-6-110, at the property's fair market value determined pursuant
to § 10-6-119.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-6:
The provisions of section 3 of this Act do not apply to assessed value derived solely
from the new construction of, reconstruction of, improvements to, or additions to, real
property for the first assessment since the new construction, reconstruction,
improvement, or addition was made.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-6:
The provisions of section 3 of this Act do not apply to property assessed under
chapters 10-28 to 10-38, inclusive.
Section 7. That § 10-6-124 be AMENDED:
10-6-124. The secretary of revenue the department may promulgate rules
pursuant to chapter 1-26 concerning the:
(1) Collection and tabulation of information required to determine median appraisal or
sales assessment ratio, and coefficient of dispersion;
(2) Criteria to be included in a compliance audit of assessment practices;
(3) Conditions under which a certificate of compliance may be issued to a county;
(4) Procedures for determining the valuation of agricultural buildings and structures;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.428.40 3 1253
(5) Procedures for determining the valuation of dwellings on agricultural land and
automobile garages or portions of buildings used as automobile garages;
(6) Application of cropland and noncropland income values;
(7) Application of soil classification standards; and
(8) Procedures for making adjustments to the value of agricultural land pursuant to
§§ 10-6-127 to 10-6-132, inclusive; and
(9) Adjustment to the assessed value of property pursuant to sections 3 to 6, inclusive,
of this Act.
Before the secretary promulgates any rules pursuant to subdivision (4) to (8),
inclusive, the secretary shall present the proposed rules to the Agricultural Land
Assessment Implementation and Oversight Advisory Task Force established pursuant to
§ 10-6-134.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.